Maryland, session 2026, HB1475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) SECTION 8–122 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE;
OR
13–321.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ALGORITHM” MEANS A COMPUTATIONAL AUTOMATED PROCESS
THAT USES A SET OF RULES TO DEFINE A SEQUENCE OF OPERATIONS.
(3) “CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS DISCLOSURE” MEANS DISCLOSURE:
(I) IN THE SAME MEDIUM AS, AND PROVIDED ON, AT, OR NEAR
AND CONTEMPORANEOUS WITH, EACH COMMUNICATION OF A PRICE FOR WHICH
NOTICE IS REQUIRED; AND
(II) USING LETTERING AND WORDING THAT IS EASILY VISIBLE
AND UNDERSTANDABLE TO A CONSUMER.

HOUSE BILL 1475 3
(4) “COMMUNICATION” MEANS AN ADVERTISEMENT, A DISPLAY, AN
IMAGE, AN OFFER, OR AN ANNOUNCEMENT.
(5) “DYNAMIC PRICING” MEANS PRICING THAT FLUCTUATES
DEPENDENT ON CONDITIONS.
(6) (I) “PERSONAL DATA” MEANS ANY DATA THAT IDENTIFIES OR
COULD REASONABLY BE LINKED, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, WITH A SPECIFIC
CONSUMER OR DEVICE.
(II) “PERSONAL DATA” DOES NOT INCLUDE LOCATION DATA.
(7) “PERSONALIZED ALGORITHMIC PRICING” MEANS DYNAMIC
PRICING SET BY AN ALGORITHM THAT USES PERSONAL DATA.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) CONDUCT OF A MERCHANT THAT IS REGULATED UNDER THE
INSURANCE ARTICLE;
(2) (I) A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION, AS DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THE
FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE; OR
(II) A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION OR AN AFFILIATE OF A
FINANCIAL INSTITUTION THAT IS SUBJECT TO TITLE V OF THE
GRAMM–LEACH–BLILEY ACT; OR
(3) A LOWER PRICE THAT IS OFFERED TO A CONSUMER WHO HAS AN
EXISTING SUBSCRIPTION–BASED CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT FOR A CONSUMER
GOOD OR SERVICE WITH A MERCHANT THAN THE PRICE OFFERED TO A CONSUMER
WITHOUT THE SUBSCRIPTION–BASED CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT.
(C) A MERCHANT MAY NOT SET THE PRICE OF SPECIFIC CONSUMER GOODS
OR SERVICES USING PERSONALIZED ALGORITHMIC PRICING AND DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY ADVERTISE, PROMOTE, LABEL, OR PUBLISH A COMMUNICATION OF THE
PERSONALIZED ALGORITHMIC PRICING FOR THE CONSUMER GOOD OR SERVICE TO
A CONSUMER IN THE STATE, UNLESS THE MERCHANT INCLUDES WITH THE
COMMUNICATION A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS DISCLOSURE WITH THE FOLLOWING
STATEMENT:
“THIS PRICE WAS SET BY AN ALGORITHM USING YOUR
PERSONAL DATA”.

HOUSE BILL 1475
Article – Real Property
8–122.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ALGORITHM” MEANS A COMPUTATIONAL AUTOMATED PROCESS
THAT USES A SET OF RULES TO DEFINE A SEQUENCE OF OPERATIONS.
(3) “ALGORITHMIC DEVICE” MEANS ANY MACHINE, DEVICE,
COMPUTER PROGRAM, OR COMPUTER SOFTWARE THAT ON ITS OWN OR WITH HUMAN
ASSISTANCE PERFORMS A COORDINATING FUNCTION.
(4) (I) “COORDINATING FUNCTION” MEANS TO:
1. COLLECT HISTORICAL OR CONTEMPORANEOUS
PRICES, SUPPLY LEVELS, OR LEASE OR RENTAL CONTRACT TERMINATION AND
RENEWAL DATES OF RESIDENTIAL UNITS FROM TWO OR MORE RESIDENTIAL RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNERS OR MANAGERS, IF AT LEAST TWO OR MORE OF THE RESIDENTIAL
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNERS OR MANAGERS FROM WHOM THE INFORMATION IS
COLLECTED ARE NOT WHOLLY OWNED SUBSIDIARIES OF THE SAME PARENT ENTITY
OR OTHERWISE OWNED OR MANAGED BY THE SAME RESIDENTIAL RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER OR MANAGER;
2. ANALYZE OR PROCESS THE INFORMATION
DESCRIBED IN ITEM 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH USING A SYSTEM, SOFTWARE, OR
PROCESS THAT USES COMPUTATION, INCLUDING BY USING THAT INFORMATION TO
TRAIN AN ALGORITHM; AND
3. RECOMMEND RENTAL PRICES, LEASE RENEWAL
TERMS, IDEAL OCCUPANCY LEVELS, OR OTHER LEASE TERMS AND CONDITIONS TO A
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER OR MANAGER.
(II) “COORDINATING FUNCTION” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
PRODUCT USED FOR THE PURPOSE OF ESTABLISHING RENT OR INCOME LIMITS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH RENT STABILIZATION LAW OR AN AFFORDABLE HOUSING
PROGRAM ADMINISTERED BY A FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR
OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISION.
(5) “RESIDENTIAL RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER OR MANAGER” MEANS
A PERSON THAT MANAGES OR DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY AND IN WHOLE OR IN PART

HOUSE BILL 1475 5
OWNS OR IS A BENEFICIAL OWNER OF AT LEAST ONE RESIDENTIAL RENTAL
PROPERTY IN THE STATE.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT OPERATE OR LICENSE SOFTWARE, A DATA
ANALYTICS SERVICE, OR AN ALGORITHMIC DEVICE THAT PERFORMS A
COORDINATING FUNCTION BETWEEN, OR ON BEHALF OF, TWO OR MORE
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL PROPERTY OWNERS OR MANAGERS TO KNOWINGLY OR
RECKLESSLY FACILITATE AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN OR AMONG THE RESIDENTIAL
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNERS OR MANAGERS.
(C) A RESIDENTIAL RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER OR MANAGER MAY NOT
KNOWINGLY OR RECKLESSLY SET OR ADJUST RENTAL PRICES, LEASE RENEWAL
TERMS, OCCUPANCY LEVELS, OR OTHER LEASE TERMS AND CONDITIONS IN ANY
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL PROPERTY BASED ON A RECOMMENDATION FROM SOFTWARE,
A DATA ANALYTICS SERVICE, OR AN ALGORITHMIC DEVICE THAT PERFORMS A
COORDINATING FUNCTION.
(D) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.